Utah statutes.
17B-2a-1002.   Legislative intent -- Purpose of water conservancy districts.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature and the policy of the state to:

(a)  provide for the conservation and development of the water and land resources of the state;

(b)  provide for the greatest beneficial use of water within the state;

(c)  control and make use of all unappropriated waters in the state and to apply those waters to direct and supplemental beneficial uses including domestic, manufacturing, irrigation, and power;

(d)  obtain from water in the state the highest duty for domestic uses and irrigation of lands in the state within the terms of applicable interstate compacts and other law;

(e)  cooperate with the United States and its agencies under federal reclamation or other laws and to construct, finance, operate, and maintain works in the state; and

(f)  promote the greater prosperity and general welfare of the people of the state by encouraging the organization of water conservancy districts.

(2)  The creation and operation of water conservancy districts are a public use to help accomplish the intent and policy stated in Subsection (1) and will:

(a)  be essentially for the benefit and advantage of the people of the state;

(b)  indirectly benefit all industries of the state;

(c)  indirectly benefit the state by increasing the value of taxable property in the state;

(d)  directly benefit municipalities by providing adequate supplies of water for domestic use;

(e)  directly benefit lands to be irrigated or drained;

(f)  directly benefit lands now under irrigation by stabilizing the flow of water in streams and by increasing flow and return flow of water to those streams; and

(g)  promote the comfort, safety, and welfare of the people of the state.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

